California, session 20252026, SB1218.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22651.10 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22651.10. (a) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a regularly employed and salaried employee who is engaged in code enforcement, of a jurisdiction in which a vehicle is located may immobilize the vehicle with a device designed and manufactured for the immobilization of vehicles, on a highway or any public lands located within the territorial limits in which the officer or employee may act if the vehicle is found upon a highway or public lands and the registered owner of the vehicle has been issued five or more notices of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code, or two or more notices of a violation of subdivision (h) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code, that are delinquent, or is known to have been issued five or more notices for failure to pay or failure to appear in court for a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code or two or more notices for failure to pay or failure to appear in court for a violation of subdivision (h) of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code, for which no certificate has been issued by the magistrate or clerk of the court hearing the case showing that the case has been adjudicated or concerning which the registered owner’s record has not been cleared. The vehicle may be immobilized until that person furnishes to the immobilizing law enforcement agency all of the following:(1) Evidence of their identity.(2) An address within this state at which they can be located.(3) Satisfactory evidence that the full amount of penalties for violations of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code has been deposited for all notices of violation issued to the person and that bail has been deposited for all violations of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code that have not been cleared. In lieu of furnishing satisfactory evidence that the full amount of penalties or bail, or both, have been deposited, the person may demand to be taken without unnecessary delay before a magistrate, for violations of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code, within the county in which the offenses charged are alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offenses and is nearest or most accessible with reference to the place where the vehicle is immobilized. Evidence of current registration shall be produced after a vehicle has been immobilized or, at the discretion of the immobilizing law enforcement agency, a notice to appear for violation of subdivision (a) of Section 4000 shall be issued to that person.(b) A person, other than a person authorized under subdivision (a), shall not immobilize a vehicle.SECTION 1.Section 4760.2 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:4760.2.(a)(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (d), the department shall refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle if the registered owner or lessee has been mailed a notice of delinquent illegal dumping violation relating to a violation of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code, the court has filed or electronically transmitted to the department an itemization of unpaid illegal dumping penalties, including administrative fees, and the owner or lessee has not paid the illegal dumping penalties and administrative fees, unless the registrant pays to the department, at the time of application for renewal, the full amount of all illegal dumping penalties and administrative fees, as shown by records of the department.(2)When the department receives the full amount of all outstanding illegal dumping penalties and administrative fees pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall issue a receipt showing each illegal dumping penalty and administrative fee that has been paid, the court for that penalty and fee, and a description of the vehicle involved in the illegal dumping violations.(3)After deducting its administrative costs incurred in implementing this section, but no more than 5 percent of the collected funds, the department shall transmit the remaining funds to the appropriate court.(b)The department shall not refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle owned by a renter or lessor if the applicant provides the department with the abstract or notice of disposition of the illegal dumping violation issued pursuant to subdivision (c) for clearing all outstanding penalties and administrative fees as shown by the records of the department.(c)The court shall issue an abstract or notice of disposition of the illegal dumping violation to the renter or lessor of a vehicle issued a notice of delinquent illegal dumping violation relating to a violation of Section 374.3 of the Penal Code if the renter or lessor provides the court with the name, address, and driver’s license number of the rentee or lessee at the time of occurrence of the illegal dumping violation.(d)The department shall not refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle if the illegal dumping violation citation was issued prior to the registered owner taking possession of the vehicle.(e)The department shall allow a registered owner or lessee to file a certification that the vehicle will not be operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway pursuant to Section 4604, if the registered owner or lessee currently owes illegal dumping penalties and administrative fees for that vehicle, regardless of whether or not that registered owner or lessee is currently on an active payment plan.